Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 36. Fertilizer.
§ 3.2-3609.
Reporting year; inspection fees; distribution to nonlicensees.

The reporting year for regulated products shall be July 1 through June 30 of the following year.

Any person who distributes any regulated product to a non-licensed person:

Shall file the tonnage statement with the Commissioner and pay to the Commissioner the inspection fee by August 1; or

Shall not be required to file the tonnage statement or pay the inspection fee, if: (i) another person agrees in a written statement, filed with the Commissioner, to file the tonnage statement and to pay to the Commissioner the inspection fee by August 1; and (ii) he files with the Commissioner by August 1 on a form furnished by the Commissioner a purchasing report stating the number of tons of regulated product purchased by the person during the reporting year and from whom the regulated product was purchased.

Any person who distributes any regulated product in Virginia to a nonlicensee shall pay to the Commissioner an inspection fee of 25 cents ($0.25) per ton of regulated product or $35, whichever is greater, per tonnage reporting year.

Any person who distributes any regulated product to a nonlicensee shall pay to the Commissioner a late fee, amounting to 10 percent of the inspection fee due, or $50, whichever is greater, in addition to the amount of the inspection fee due, if the tonnage statement is not filed, is misstated, or if the payment of inspection fees is not made within 15 working days of the specified filing date.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.8; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subdivision B 2, deleted “or approved” following “furnished”; in subsection C, substituted “any regulated product” for “fertilizer” and “per ton of regulated product” for “per ton of fertilizer, including specialty fertilizer,” and deleted “as provided for in subsection B” following “nonlicense”; deleted subsection D, which concerned the payment of an inspection fee to the Commissioner; and redesignated former subsection E as subsection D, and therein substituted “Any person who distributes any regulated product to a nonlicensee shall pay” for “The person subject to subsection B shall pay.”

§ 3.2-3610.
Statistical reports.

For commercial fertilizer:

Any person distributing commercial fertilizer to a nonlicensee shall furnish the Commissioner an annual statistical report showing:

The county or city of the nonlicensee consignee;

The amounts (expressed in tons, or decimal portions) of each grade of fertilizer; and

The form in which the person distributed the fertilizer (e.g., in bags, bulk, or in liquid form).

This information shall be submitted in the following form and shall specify shipments made during the preceding year:

If the annual statistical report is not filed within 15 working days of the specified filing date, a late fee of $35 shall be assessed against the licensee.

For all other regulated products:

The person distributing or selling such products to a nonlicensee shall furnish the Commissioner an annual report showing:

The county or city of the nonlicensee consignee; and

The amounts (expressed in tons, or decimal portions) of each grade under a given brand of product.

Any person listed in subdivision B 1 who fails to file this report by August 1 shall pay a late fee of $35 to the Commissioner.

a.

A statistical summary report on a form prescribed by the Commissioner, on or before August 1; or

b.

A statistical summary report by electronic transfer, utilizing the Uniform Fertilizer Tonnage Reporting System. Prior to using the electronic transfer method, the person responsible for submitting the annual tonnage report shall make arrangements with the Commissioner for the Commissioner’s receipt of the report by such method.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.9; 1995, c. 104; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subdivision A 1, deleted “or selling” following “distributing” and substituted “an annual statistical report” for “a monthly report”; in the introductory language in subdivision A 2, substituted “year” for “month”; in subdivision A 2 a, inserted “statistical” and substituted “August 1” for “the 20th day of each month”; in subdivision A 2 b, inserted “statistical” and substituted “annual tonnage report” for “monthly tonnage report”; and in subdivision A 3, substituted “annual statistical report” for “monthly report” and “filed within 15 working days of the specified filing date” for “filed by the due date.”

§ 3.2-3611.
Labeling.

The distributor or guarantor of any regulated product distributed in the Commonwealth shall affix a label to the container or provide an invoice at the time of delivery for a bulk regulated product that states in clear, legible and conspicuous form, in the English language, the following information:

The quantity statement;

The grade under a given brand. The grade shall not be required when no primary nutrients are claimed;

The guaranteed analysis, which shall:

For fertilizers, conform to the requirements adopted by AAPFCO in its Official Publication in the Rules and Regulations-Fertilizer section of the Officially Adopted Documents, as amended, with the percentage of each plant nutrient stated as follows:

Total Nitrogen (N) _____ % Available Phosphate (P205) _____ % Soluble Potash (K20) _____ %

Click to view

For unacidulated mineral phosphate materials and basic slag, bone, tankage, and other organic phosphate materials, the available phosphate (P205), or the degree of fineness, or both, may also be guaranteed;

Guarantees for plant nutrients other than nitrogen (N), phosphate (P205), and potash (K20) shall be expressed in the form of the element. A statement of the sources of nutrients including oxides, salt, and chelates, may be required on the application for registration of specialty fertilizers, and may be included as a parenthetical statement on the label. Degree of acidity or alkalinity (pH), beneficial substances, or compounds determinable by laboratory methods also may be guaranteed by permission of the Commissioner and with the advice of the Director of the Virginia Agricultural Experiment Station. When any degree of acidity or alkalinity (pH), beneficial substances, or compounds are guaranteed, they shall be subject to inspection and analysis in accord with the methods and regulations prescribed by the Board;

For soil amendments, conform to the requirements adopted by AAPFCO in its Official Publication in the Labeling section of the Uniform Soil Amendment Bill of the Officially Adopted Documents, as amended;

For horticultural growing media, include a list of ingredients and other guarantees as required by regulation and a statement of added fertilizers, if any;

When compost or digestate derived from sewage sludge, hazardous materials, unrendered animals or poultry or their parts, or other source material specified in regulations established by the Board is used as an ingredient, identify the source material of the compost or digestate;

When an industrial co-product is used as an ingredient, identify the source material and percentage or other acceptable unit; and

Include a list of such other ingredients and guarantees as may be required by the Board through regulation.

The name and address of the registrant or licensee; and

Directions for use and warning statements in accordance with the standards adopted by AAPFCO in its Officially Adopted Documents of the Official Publication, as amended.

A commercial fertilizer that is formulated according to specifications provided by a consumer prior to mixing shall be labeled to show: (i) the quantity statement; (ii) the guaranteed analysis; and (iii) the name and address of the distributor or the licensee.

[Repealed.]

Beginning December 31, 2013, lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer shall be labeled as follows:

“Do not apply near water, storm drains, or drainage ditches. Do not apply if heavy rain is expected. Apply this product only to your lawn/garden, and sweep any product that lands on the driveway, sidewalk, or street, back onto your lawn/garden.”

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.5; 1995, c. 104; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 341, 353, 552, 564; 2022, cc. 538, 539.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 341 and 353 are identical, and added subsection D.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in the first sentence in subsection A, substituted “distributor” for “manufacturer”; in the introductory paragraph in subdivision A 3 a, substituted the language beginning “conform to the requirements adopted” and ending “as amended” for “conform to the following”; in subdivision A 3 a (3), inserted “Agricultural” in the next-to-last sentence; rewrote subdivision A 3 b, which read: “For soil amendments, consist of a list of ingredients, and may include a statement of naturally occurring nutrient levels”; deleted subdivision A 3 c, which concerned soil conditioners, including polyelectrolytes; redesignated former subdivision A 3 d as subdivision A 3 c, and therein added “and a statement of added fertilizers, if any”; added subdivision A 3 e and redesignated former subdivision A 3 e as subdivision A 3 d; added subdivision A 5; in subsection B, deleted “or any fertilizer formulated for a consumer” following “prior to mixing”; and deleted subsection C, which read: “For horticultural growing media, a statement of added fertilizers, if any, shall be listed on the registration document and customer sales invoice.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 538 and 539 are identical, and inserted “or digestate” twice in subdivision A 3 d.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 14.

§ 3.2-3612.
Misbranding.

It is unlawful to distribute misbranded regulated product. A regulated product shall be deemed to be misbranded if:

It has a label that is false or misleading in any particular;

It is distributed under the name of another product;

It is not labeled as specified in §

3.2-3611

, and in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter; or

It purports to be, or is represented as, a fertilizer, or is represented as containing a plant nutrient or fertilizer, unless such plant nutrient or fertilizer conforms to the definition of identity, if any, as prescribed by regulation of the Board.

The guarantor of any regulated product found to be misbranded shall pay to the consumer an assessment equal to 10 percent of the retail value of the regulated product sold to the consumer and found to be in violation of subsection A not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence. The assessment for misbranding shall apply only to the retail sale of any regulated product made from a lot or a portion thereof after the Commissioner has inspected the lot or a portion thereof. The assessment for misbranding shall be in addition to any assessment for plant food deficiency.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.10; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “guarantor” for “person whose name is on the label,” inserted “sold to the consumer and,” deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” and added “not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence,” in the second sentence, substituted “inspected” for “sampled,” and added the last sentence.

§ 3.2-3613.
Adulteration.

It is unlawful to distribute an adulterated regulated product. A regulated product shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

It contains any deleterious or harmful ingredient, in sufficient amount to render it injurious to beneficial plant life, when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label;

It does not contain an adequate warning statement, or directions for use, on the label sufficient to protect plant life;

It has a composition that falls below or differs from that which it is purported to possess by its labeling; or

It contains unwanted crop seed, or viable prohibited or restricted noxious weed seeds in amounts exceeding the limits specified in the regulations of the Board.

The guarantor of any regulated product found to be adulterated shall pay to the consumer an assessment equal to 10 percent of the retail value of the regulated product sold to the consumer and found to be in violation of subsection A not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence. The assessment for adulteration shall apply only to the retail sale of any regulated product made from a lot or a portion thereof after the Commissioner has inspected the lot or a portion thereof. The assessment for adulteration shall be in addition to any assessment for plant food deficiency.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.11; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “guarantor” for “person whose name is on the label” and inserted “sold to the consumer and,” in the second sentence, substituted “inspected” for “sampled,” and added the last sentence.

§ 3.2-3614.
Commercial value.

For the purpose of determining the commercial value to be applied in making assessments for variance from guarantee, the Commissioner shall determine the values per unit of total nitrogen (N), available phosphate (P205), soluble potash (K20), and micronutrients in fertilizers in the Commonwealth.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.12; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3615.
Plant food deficiency.

The Commissioner shall calculate assessments for a deficiency of: (i) total nitrogen (N); (ii) available phosphate (P205); or (iii) soluble potash (K20). If the analysis shows that the fertilizer is deficient: (a) in one or more of the guaranteed primary plant nutrients, beyond the investigational allowances and compensations, as established by regulation; or (b) that the overall index value of the fertilizer is below the level established by regulation, then an assessment for variance from guarantee of two times the value of such deficiency, not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence, shall be paid to the consumer by the guarantor. When the fertilizer is subject to an assessment under both clauses (a) and (b), the Commissioner shall calculate assessments under both such clauses and the guarantor shall pay to the consumer the larger of the two assessments.

If, upon evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner, a person is found to have: (i) altered the content of any fertilizer shipped to him by a licensee; or (ii) mixed, or commingled, fertilizer from two or more distributors, such that the result of either alteration changes the analysis of the fertilizer as originally guaranteed, then the person who has altered, mixed or commingled shall: (a) obtain a license and register the altered or mixed product; (b) be held liable for all assessments; and (c) be subject to other provisions of this chapter including seizure, condemnation, and stop sale.

A deficiency in an official sample of mixed fertilizer, resulting from nonuniformity, is not distinguishable from a deficiency due to actual plant nutrient shortage, and any deficiency due to nonuniformity shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.13; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subsection B, deleted “registrant or” preceding “licensee,” and substituted “distributors” for “suppliers” and “obtain a license and register the altered or mixed product” for “obtain a registration or a license.”

§ 3.2-3616.
Assessments for variance from label guarantees.

The guarantor shall pay to the consumer all assessments for misbranding, adulteration or plant food deficiency on the lot of regulated product represented by the sample analyzed. The guarantor shall make payment to the consumer within 60 days after the date of notice from the Commissioner to the guarantor. The guarantor shall obtain a receipt documenting the payment of such assessment, which shall be forwarded to the Commissioner within the 60-day period during which payment to the consumer is made.

If the guarantor cannot locate the consumer within 60 days; the amount of the assessment shall be paid to the Commissioner, who shall deposit it in the state treasury, and report to the State Comptroller, who shall credit the amount to a special fund for the sale of substandard fertilizer. The Commissioner shall pay to the consumer of a lot of regulated product on which the assessment was made an amount equal to the assessment from the Sale of Substandard Fertilizer Fund if the consumer can be located in 90 days. The State Comptroller shall transfer any balance remaining in the fund for a period of 90 days to the Feed, Lime, Fertilizer, and Animal Remedies Fund as specified by §

3.2-3617

. Any person required to pay an assessment who fails to pay the assessment within the time specified shall pay to the Commissioner a late fee of 10 percent of the assessment, or $50, whichever is greater, in addition to the assessment. The Commissioner may cancel the license of such person who fails to pay the assessment.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.14; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3617.
Fund established; disposition of fees, assessments, and penalties.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Feed, Lime, Fertilizer, and Animal Remedies Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Except as otherwise specified, moneys levied and collected pursuant to this chapter and pursuant to Chapters 37, 48, and 49 shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

All fees, assessments and penalties, including funds transferred from the Fund for the Sale of Substandard Fertilizer pursuant to §

3.2-3616

, received by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be paid into the Feed, Lime, Fertilizer, and Animal Remedies Fund, to the credit of the Department, to be used in carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter, to include inspection, sampling and other expenses; except that the Commissioner shall deposit, to the credit of the Virginia Agricultural Foundation Fund established pursuant to §

3.2-2905

, five cents ($0.05) of the inspection fee per ton of regulated product.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.22; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, § 11.

§ 3.2-3618.
Inspection, sampling and analysis; penalty.

The Commissioner shall: (i) sample, inspect, analyze, and test any regulated product distributed within the Commonwealth; (ii) inspect storage facilities where such regulated product is stored; (iii) monitor and, where the Commissioner deems it necessary, regulate the manufacturing procedures of such regulated products as affected by best management practices for manufacturing containment and considerations of environmental factors; and (iv) allocate adequate personnel to the major farm fertilizer consuming areas of the state to carry out his duties under this chapter as such duties relate to insuring the quality, analysis, and quantity of fertilizer sold and distributed in the state.The Commissioner is authorized to enter during operating hours the premises or carriers of any person subject to regulation under this chapter, in order to have access to: (i) the regulated product, storage facilities and manufacturing practices; and (ii) records relating to the distribution and storage of regulated product.

Any person who shall hinder or obstruct in any way the Commissioner in the performance of his official duties is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

The Commissioner shall use the methods of sampling and analysis adopted by the Commissioner or the Board.

The Commissioner, in determining for administrative purposes whether any fertilizer is deficient in plant food, shall be guided solely by the official sample. The Commissioner shall obtain and analyze samples as specified in subsection C of this section.

The Commissioner may distribute information regarding official analysis of fertilizers. The Commissioner shall retain official samples establishing an assessment for variance from guarantee for a minimum of 90 days from issuance of a deficiency report.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.7; 1995, c. 104; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-3619.
Stop sale, use, removal, or seizure orders; penalty.

The Commissioner may issue and enforce a written or printed stop sale, use, removal, or seizure order to the owner or custodian of any lot of regulated product distributed in violation of this chapter. The Commissioner shall release for distribution the regulated product held under a stop sale, use, removal, or seizure order when the requirements of this chapter have been met. If the Commissioner determines that the regulated product cannot be brought into compliance with the chapter, the Commissioner shall release the regulated product to be remanufactured, returned to the manufacturer, or destroyed.

The Board may impose a civil penalty of up to $250 on any person violating a written or printed stop sale, use, removal, or seizure order.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.15; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 3.2-3620.
Seizure and condemnation.

The Commissioner may seize any lot of regulated product not in compliance with this chapter. The Commissioner may make application for seizure to an appropriate court in the city or county where such regulated product is located. In the event that the court finds such regulated product to be in violation of this chapter, and orders the condemnation of such regulated product, the owner of the regulated product shall dispose of the seized regulated product in any manner that, in the opinion of the Commissioner, is consistent with the quality of the regulated product, and that complies with the laws of the Commonwealth. In no instance shall the court order the disposition of such regulated product without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the regulated product, or for permission to process or relabel the regulated product, to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.16; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and deleted “In addition to the provisions of §

3.2-3623

” from the beginning and made a related change.

§ 3.2-3621.
Cancellation of registration, permit, or license.

The Commissioner may: (i) cancel the license or permit of any person; (ii) cancel the registration of any brand of regulated product; or (iii) refuse to register any brand of regulated product, or issue any license. The Commissioner shall cancel or refuse a license or registration upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant or licensee, has used fraudulent or deceptive practices in the evasion, or attempted evasion, of this chapter or any regulations adopted hereunder.

In addition, the Commissioner may cancel the license, permit or registration of any person who willfully fails to comply with this chapter by:

Failing to file the tonnage report;

Falsifying information;

Making an inaccurate statement of tonnage distributed in the Commonwealth during any reporting year;

Making an inaccurate listing of regulated products for registration;

Failing to pay the license, permit, registration or inspection fee;

Failing to accurately report any of the information required to be submitted under this chapter;

Failing to keep records for a period of three years; or

Failing to allow inspection of records by the Commissioner.

History.

1994, c. 740, §§ 3.1-106.8, 3.1-106.18; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in clause (i) in subsection A, deleted “registration” following “cancel the” and “contractor-applicator” following “license or.”

§ 3.2-3622.
Commissioner’s actions; injunction.

Nothing in this chapter shall require the Commissioner to report for prosecution, or institute seizure proceedings, where the Commissioner considers the violations of the chapter to be minor. In such cases, the Commissioner may serve a suitable notice of warning in writing, when he believes that the public interest will be best served by so doing.

The Commissioner may apply for, and the court to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating, or continuing to violate, this chapter or any regulation adopted under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.17; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3623.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 552 and 564, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-3623

, pertaining to notice of violations and penalty, was derived from Acts 1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.17; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3624.
Warning.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner to report for the institution of proceedings under this chapter, minor violations of this chapter, whenever the Commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

2011, cc. 552, 564.

§ 3.2-3625.
Violations; civil penalties.

The Commissioner shall give notice of the violation to the registrant or the licensee responsible for the regulated product. The Commissioner may give notice to the distributor from whom the Commissioner sampled the regulated product.

To determine the amount of any civil penalty, the Commissioner shall give due consideration to (i) the history of previous violations, (ii) the seriousness of the violation, and (iii) the demonstrated good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance with the chapter after notification of the violation.

The Commissioner shall determine procedures for payment of uncontested civil penalties. The procedures shall include provisions for a person to consent to abatement of the alleged violation and pay a penalty or negotiated sum in lieu of such penalty without admission of civil liability arising from such alleged violation.

The person to whom a civil penalty is issued shall have 15 days to request an informal fact-finding conference, held pursuant to §

2.2-4019

, to challenge the fact or amount of the civil penalty. If the civil penalty is upheld, the person against whom the civil penalty has been upheld shall have 15 days to pay the proposed penalty in full, or if the person wishes to contest either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation, forward the proposed amount to the Commissioner’s office for placement in an interest-bearing trust account in the State Treasurer’s office. If through administrative or judicial review of the proposed penalty, it is determined that no violation occurred, or that the amount of penalty should be reduced, the Commissioner shall within 30 days of that determination remit the appropriate amount to the person with interest accrued thereon.

Final orders of the Commissioner may be recorded, enforced, and satisfied as orders or decrees of a circuit court upon certification of such orders by the Commissioner. Such orders may be appealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Except as otherwise provided, any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

2011, cc. 552, 564.